Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Firefighters and deleted text begin emergencydeleted text end medical personnel. Whoever deleted text begin assaults anydeleted text end new text begin commits eithernew text end of the following deleted text begin persons and inflicts demonstrable bodily harmdeleted text end new text begin acts against a member of a municipal or volunteer fire department or emergency medical services personnel unit in the performance of the member's duties or against a physician, nurse, or other person providing health care servicesnew text end is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or both: (1) deleted text begin a member of a municipal or volunteer fire department or emergency medical services personnel unit in the performance of the member's dutiesdeleted text end new text begin assaults the person and inflicts demonstrable bodily harmnew text end ; or (2) deleted text begin a physician, nurse, or other person providing health care services in a hospital emergency departmentdeleted text end new text begin intentionally throws or otherwise transfers bodily fluids or feces at or onto the personnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end